Montana, session 2025, HB450.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 87-3-602, MCA, is amended to read:
"87-3-602. Training bird hunting dogs -- Class D-5 license -- rulemaking. (1) (a) Training of bird
hunting dogs using game birds not raised in captivity is allowed with the purchase of a Class D-5 license and
pursuant to the requirements of this part.
(b) A Class D-5 license is required for training bird dogs using game birds not raised in captivity. A
person who is at least 18 years of age or older or who will turn 18 years of age during the season for which the
license is issued may purchase a license for a fee of $5 for residents and $10 for nonresidents. The department
may issue a free resident or nonresident Class D-5 license to a youth who is 12 to 18 years of age.
(c) An applicant for a Class D-5 license shall report on the application the number of dogs to be
trained. The number of dogs must be printed on the license issued by the department.
(2) A Class D-5 license is not required for a person training bird hunting dogs with a method that
kills game birds raised in captivity. A person shall tag or mark the captive game bird prior to release. Captive
game birds must be obtained from a game bird farm licensed under 87-4-903 or from a source of game birds
approved by the department.
(3) A person who takes an untagged or unmarked game bird while training a bird hunting dog
outside of the established season for that species or who is not licensed to take that species shall immediately
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 450
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 450
report the taking to a representative of the department.
"
Section 2. Section 87-3-604, MCA, is amended to read:
"87-3-604. Rulemaking authority. The commission shall may adopt rules to implement the
provisions of this part, including but not limited to limiting the number of Class D-5 licenses issued to
nonresidents and limiting the number of dogs that may be trained under a Class D-5 license."
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 450
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 450, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 450
INTRODUCED BY E. ALBUS, P. STRAND, R. GREGG, G. HUNTER, C. SPRUNGER, D. LOGE, B. LER, L.
DEMING, T. FRANCE, P. TUSS, Z. WIRTH, V. MOORE
AN ACT REVISING LAWS RELATED TO CLASS D-5 LICENSES FOR TRAINING BIRD HUNTING DOGS;
REQUIRING AN APPLICANT FOR A CLASS D-5 LICENSE TO REPORT THE NUMBER OF DOGS THAT WILL
BE TRAINED; ALLOWING THE FISH AND WILDLIFE COMMISSION TO REGULATE THE NUMBER OF CLASS
D-5 LICENSES; PROVIDING RULEMAKING AUTHORITY; AND AMENDING SECTION SECTIONS 87-3-602
AND 87-3-604, MCA.”